Maryland, session 2025, HB0339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–121.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “HVAC SYSTEM” MEANS A HEATING, VENTILATING,
AND AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0339*

HOUSE BILL 339
(B) (A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
UNITS IN APARTMENT BUILDINGS WITH FOUR OR MORE INDIVIDUAL DWELLING
UNITS.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS
LOCATED IN PROPERTY LISTED ON THE NATIONAL REGISTER OF HISTORIC PLACES.
(C) (B) A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE AIR–CONDITIONING IN EACH
RESIDENTIAL UNIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) (C) OF THIS SECTION AS
FOLLOWS:
(1) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2025, FOR NEWLY CONSTRUCTED
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS; AND
(2) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, FOR RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS
THAT UNDERGO AN UPGRADE OR MAINTENANCE TO THE UNIT’S HVAC SYSTEM
THAT MEETS THE THRESHOLD OF “ALTERATION” OUTLINED IN THE AMERICAN
SOCIETY OF HEATING, REFRIGERATING, AND AIR–CONDITIONING ENGINEERS
(ASHRAE) STANDARD 90.1 (ENERGY STANDARD FOR SITES AND BUILDINGS
EXCEPT LOW–RISE RESIDENTIAL BUILDINGS) RENOVATION THAT INCLUDES THE
REPLACEMENT OR SUBSTANTIAL UPGRADE OF ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS OR HEATING
SYSTEMS.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH YEAR
FROM JUNE 1 TO SEPTEMBER 30, BOTH INCLUSIVE, A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE
AIR–CONDITIONING IN EACH RESIDENTIAL UNIT:
(I) AT A TEMPERATURE IN THE 90% ACCEPTABILITY
THRESHOLD OF THE ASHRAE STANDARD 55 (THERMAL ENVIRONMENTAL
CONDITIONS FOR HUMAN OCCUPANCY) AT 3 FEET ABOVE THE FLOOR LEVEL IN
EACH HABITABLE SPACE IN THE UNIT; AND
(II) IF A DAY’S 24–HOUR TEMPERATURE AVERAGE IS EXPECTED
TO BE GREATER THAN 92.3 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT, AT A TEMPERATURE IN THE 80%
ACCEPTABILITY THRESHOLD OF THE ASHRAE STANDARD 55 AT 3 FEET ABOVE THE
FLOOR LEVEL IN EACH HABITABLE SPACE IN THE UNIT.
(2) (I) FOR AN AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM THAT IS NOT UNDER
THE CONTROL OF THE TENANT, THE LANDLORD SHALL MAINTAIN THE
TEMPERATURE IN THE UNIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(II) FOR AN AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM THAT IS UNDER THE
CONTROL OF THE TENANT, THE LANDLORD SHALL ENSURE THAT THE

HOUSE BILL 339 3
AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM IS IN GOOD WORKING ORDER AND IS CAPABLE OF
MAINTAINING THE TEMPERATURE IN THE UNIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE NECESSARY FOR PURPOSES OF REASONABLE
MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR, EACH YEAR FROM JUNE 1 TO SEPTEMBER 30, BOTH
INCLUSIVE, A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE AIR–CONDITIONING IN EACH
RESIDENTIAL UNIT AS FOLLOWS:
(1) FOR AN AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM THAT IS NOT UNDER THE
CONTROL OF THE TENANT, THE LANDLORD SHALL MAINTAIN THE TEMPERATURE IN
THE UNIT AT NOT GREATER THAN 80 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT AT 3 FEET ABOVE THE
FLOOR LEVEL IN EACH HABITABLE SPACE IN THE UNIT; AND
(2) FOR AN AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM THAT IS UNDER THE
CONTROL OF THE TENANT, THE LANDLORD SHALL ENSURE THAT THE
AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM IS IN GOOD WORKING ORDER AND IS CAPABLE OF
MAINTAINING THE TEMPERATURE IN THE UNIT AT NOT GREATER THAN 80 DEGREES
FAHRENHEIT AT 3 FEET ABOVE THE FLOOR LEVEL IN EACH HABITABLE SPACE IN
THE UNIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any building construction or renovation for which the building permit is
issued before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.